Utah statutes.
34A-1-304.   Rulemaking -- Electronic or similar methods of proceedings.

(1) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission shall make rules governing adjudicative procedures including the forms of notices and the manner of serving notice in all claims.

(b)  Except as provided in this title and Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the rules made under this section are not required to conform to common law or statutory rules of evidence or other technical rules of procedure.

(2)  The rules made under this section shall include procedures to dispose of cases informally, or to expedite claims adjudication, narrow issues, and simplify the methods of proof at hearings.

(3)  The commission may by rule permit hearings or other adjudicative proceedings to be conducted, recorded, or published by means of electronic devices or other similar methods.

